Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-194
Board of Parole; advise Board of Pardons upon request.

The Board of Parole shall, when requested by the Board of Pardons, advise it concerning applications requesting the exercise of pardon authority and shall make such investigation and collect such records as may bear on such applications.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 25, p. 3086.